br_FR.dic
abad/a0p1 po:g 
abadenner/a0p6 po:g 
abadennerez/a0p1 po:b 
adperc'hennetoc'h/a0 
aeler/p6a0 po:g 
afellig/a0 
alarm/p5a0 po:g 
amdonnegezh/a0 
amgildro/p4a0 po:b 
anatoradus/n1a0 po:aa 
andagoùigoù/a0 
aourerien/a0 
aparailh/a0p5 po:g 
araez/p4a0 po:g 
araoka/d2a0 po:v st:araoka #araokaat
ardead/p1a0 po:g 
arfroù/p7a0 po:g 
argadegigoù/a0 
argeziad/p5a0 po:g 
armenianek/n1a0 po:aa 
artroz/a0 
arveuz/p4a0 po:g 
askelenn/p5a0 po:g 
atomennoù/a0 
bannik/m0d1 po:v st:bannik #bannikat
begel/p4 po:g 
begonata/d3m0 po:v st:begonata #begonata
berlobi/d1m0 po:v st:berlobi #berlobiañ
bevenn/m0d1 po:v st:bevenn #bevennañ
bhojpuri/n1m0 po:aa 
birvidika/d2m0 po:v st:birvidika #birvidikaat
bit/p5m0 po:g 
boueta/d3m0 po:v st:boueta #boueta
boujantaat/m0 po:v st:boujanta is:inf 
boullder/p4m0 po:g 
breuta/d2m0 po:v st:breuta #breutaat
brizhroudenfl/a1 
buaneka/d3m0 po:v st:buaneka #buaneka
burlut/d1m0 po:v st:burlut #burlutiñ
c'hoazh/a1 
c'hwiberezh/p4 po:g 
c'hwileta/d3 po:v st:c’hwileta #c’hwileta
damouezh/m0 po:v is:inf 
danava/d2m0 po:v st:danava #tanavaat
daremoug/p5m0 po:g 
dargwa/n1m0 po:aa 
darouedenn/a1 
dekrannel/p3m0 po:g 
destrizherez/p1m0 po:b 
destrizher/p6m0 po:g 
dewelerez/p1m0 po:b 
diarroudenn/p5m0 po:b 
diasavel/n1m0 po:aa 
diazalc'h/p4m0 po:g 
diloc'heka/d2m0 po:v st:diloc’heka #? kkeg ? diloc'hekaat  
dilouez/a1 
diorroerez/p1m0 po:b 
diorroer/p6m0 po:g 
displeta/d2m0 po:v st:displeta #displetaat
displeta/d3m0 po:v st:displeta #? d3evaat displetaat
dizona/d2m0 po:v st:dizona #dizonaat
doue/a1 
dreistad/p5m0 po:g 
ejiptologour/p6 po:g 
elumadurioùigoù/a0 
emplegat/n1a0 po:aa 
emvataerez/p1a0 po:b 
emvataer/p6a0 po:g 
emvlisa/d3a0 po:v st:emvlisa #? kkeg ? emvlisa
enank/a0d1 po:v st:enank #enankañ
enebiad/p1a0 po:g 
enepyuzevourez/a0 
engoz/p4a0 po:g 
enlaka/d2a0 po:v st:enlaka #enlakaat
esmoljon/a0 
ezkefiad/p5a0 po:g 
fach/a1 
forc'hata/d3 po:v st:forc’hata #forc’hata
galizeg/m0 po:g 
garventek/n1m0 po:aa 
gennask/a1 
glaoueta/d3m0 po:v st:glaoueta #glaoueta
gleboreka/d2m0 po:v st:gleboreka #gleborekaat
gouzav/p4m0 po:g 
gra/d7m1 po:v st:gra #ober
gujarati/m0 po:g 
guzhut/a1 
gwaskenn/d1m0 po:v st:gwaskenn #gwaskennañ
gwenvidika/d2m0 po:v st:gwenvidika #gwenvidikaat
gwerc'hel/p3m0 po:g 
gwezhiad/p5m0 po:g 
gwiad/d1m0 po:v st:gwiad #gwiadiñ
gwrac'h/d1m0 po:v st:gwrac’h #gwrac'hat
hañvetoc'h/a0 
hensaoznek/n1a0 po:aa 
hezalc'hañ/a0 
hurlinkañ/a0 
ijinadennerez/p1a0 po:b 
ijinadenner/p6a0 po:g 
ijinadennourez/p1a0 po:b 
ijinadennour/p6a0 po:g 
ijinadenn/p5l5a0 po:b 
ioneka/d2a0 po:v st:ioneka #ionekaat
kabilek/n1m0 po:aa 
kafeta/d3m0 po:v st:kafeta #kafeta
kaketou/p1m0 po:g 
keallun/p4m0 po:b 
kechuaeg/m0 po:g 
kenforc'h/p5m0 po:b 
kenlieskement/n1m0 po:aa 
kenskejadur/p4m0 po:g 
kêraoz/a1 
kevelstrollañ/m0 po:v st:kevelstroll is:inf 
kildro/m0d2 po:v st:kildro #kildreiñ
konikleta/d3m0 po:v st:konikleta #konikleta
krog/m0d1 po:v st:krog #kregiñ
kurdek/n1m0 po:aa 
lanv/p4l4 po:g 
lanv/p5l5 po:g 
laouena/d2 po:v st:laouena #laouenaat
lavig/a1 
lez/p4 po:g 
locheta/d3m0 po:v st:locheta #locheta
malgudenn/m0d1 po:v st:malgudenn #malgudenniñ
manchou/n1m0 po:aa 
mantell/m0d1 po:v st:mantell #mantellañ
melestr/m0d1 po:v st:melestr #melestriñ
merdeer/p4m0 po:g 
meureka/d2m0 po:v st:meureka #meurekaat
milheriñ/m0 po:v is:inf st:milher 
minc'hoarzh/m0d1 po:v st:minc’hoarzh #minc'hoarzh
mouskan/m0d1 po:v st:mouskan #mouskanañ 
moustañva/d3m0 po:v st:moustañva #moustañva
niue/n1 po:aa 
oberourien/a0 
ourvezoc'h/a0 
pañsion/m0d1 po:v st:pañsion #pañsioniñ
paoura/d2m0 po:v st:paoura #paouraat
paranoiakez/p1m0 po:b 
paranoiak/p1m0 po:g 
parlant/m0d1 po:v st:parlant #parlant parlantal parlantal
pementranner/p4m0 po:g 
penel/p4l4m0 po:g 
pennbajenn/m0p5 po:b 
penndrab/d1m0 po:v st:penndrab #penndrabiñ
pevarlamm/m0d1 po:v st:pevarlamm #pevarlammat
pichelota/d3m0 po:v st:pichelota #pichelota
pilpeuk/m0d1 po:v st:pilpeuk #pilpeukañ
plantezad/p1m0 po:g 
plezh/m0d1 po:v st:plezh #plezhañ
pohnpei/n1m0 po:aa 
prud/a1 
ratreadur/p4 po:g 
riñvenn/p5 po:b 
sidamo/n1 po:aa 
sklaveta/d3 po:v st:sklaveta #sklaveta
sko/d2 po:v st:sko #skeiñ
speg/a1 
stlenngrafer/p6 po:g 
tagalog/n1m0 po:aa 
teulenn/p5m0 po:b 
teuska/d2m0 po:v st:teuska #teuskaat
tirenneg/p2m0 po:b 
tistremp/a1 
tourc'ha/d3m0 po:v st:tourc’ha #tourc'ha
treol/p4m0 po:g 
trirannel/p3m0 po:g 
turkmenek/n1m0 po:aa 
usvoull/a0d1 po:v st:usvoull #usvoullañ
zerzhienn/a1 
zreud/a1 
